Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2145.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 2-128 is hereby amended to read as follows: 2-
128. (a) Except as otherwise provided, immediately upon incorporation
and annually thereafter on or before the second Tuesday of December,
the stockholders of record or members of fair associations governed by
the provisions of chapter 1, Laws of 1929, and acts amendatory or
supplemental amendments thereto, shall meet and elect a board of
directors representing each township of the county (, provided there are
stockholders resident of such townships willing to serve), who shall
serve for a term of three years, and the board shall be so arranged that
one-third 1/ of the directors' terms shall expire annually. A personal
3
notification stating the time and place of the annual election shall be
mailed to each stockholder, or to each member, or published in one
issue of a newspaper of general circulation in the county at least ten 10
days prior thereto. Immediately at the close of the annual meeting, the
board of directors shall meet and elect managing officers for the
ensuing year, consisting of a president and vice-president a vice
president, who shall be members of the board of directors, and a
secretary and a treasurer and such other officers and committees as they
the board may deem necessary, who may or may not be members of the
board of directors. At the first election of directors one-third, 1/ of said
3
such directors shall be chosen for terms of one year, one-third 1/ for
3
terms of two years, and one-third 1/ for terms of three years.
3
(b) The county fair board of Cloud county shall consist of 12
members. An annual meeting for appointment of members of the fair
board to succeed members with expiring terms shall be conducted in
December by the presiding county commissioners. At the annual
appointment meeting, one member of the board shall be appointed, if
possible, from each county commissioner district and one member shall
be appointed from the county at large. Any person of legal voting age
and residing in the county shall be eligible for membership on the
board.
(c) The county fair board of Butler county shall consist of 15
members. An annual meeting for appointment of members of the fair
board to succeed members with expiring terms shall be conducted in
December by the presiding county commissioners. At the annual
appointment meeting, one member of the board shall be appointed, if
possible, from each county commissioner district and not more than
five members may be appointed from the county at large. Any person of
legal voting age and residing in the county shall be eligible for
membership on the board.
(d) The term of office of each member of the fair boards appointed
pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) shall be three years commencing on
January 1 and ending on December 31. Members of each such board
shall be eligible to serve unlimited consecutive terms. Vacancies in the
membership of each such board shall be filled by appointment by the
remaining members of such board for the unexpired term of office.
Members of each board shall elect a president, vice president,
secretary and treasurer from among the members of such board.

Substitute for HOUSE BILL No. 2145—page 2
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2-128 and 19-2699 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the HOUSE, and passed
that body
Speaker of the House.
Chief Clerk of the House.
Passed the SENATE
______________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
Secretary of the Senate.
APPROVED
__________________________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.